src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Veps Noun inflection
!! * Metrical feet
!! 	* Disyllables
!! 		* pyrrhic, dibrach : kala
!! 		* iamb	  	  : veneh
!! 		* trochee, choree  : sanha sana+N+Sg+Ill
!! 		* spondee	: landeh
!! 	* Trisyllables
!! 		* tribrach
!! 		* dactyl
!! 		* amphibrach
!! 		* anapaest, antidactylus : venehed 
!! 		* bacchius
!! 		* antibacchius
!! 		* cretic, amphimacer
!! 		* molossus

LEXICON N_
+TYÄ: # ;

LEXICON N_MUNA ! Stem vowel alternation ZERO-A-ZERO muna:mun
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!:QAQ1 NMN_ ;
!an
!id
:a SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ha K ;
:%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
! Plural
:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_SANA
! sana = pyrrhic <
! sanad = iamb   <
! sanha = trochee < *sanahan anapaest
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:a SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ha K ;
:%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
! Plural
:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;
 R ;

LEXICON N_MARJ 
 N_0/an/ad/aha/oid ;
LEXICON N_0/an/ad/aha/oid
! _0/an/ad/aha/oid
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par

! The accusative singular has two forms, one is the same as the 
!! nominative singular in form and the other is identical to the 
!! genitive singular. This definition is dependent on the school
!! and its use should be associated with the user group, perhaps.

!!€gt-norm:   Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm: Noun - marj
!!€  marj: marj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  marjan: marj+N+Sg+Gen
!!€  [marj, marjan]: marj+N+Sg+Acc
!!€  marjad: marj+N+Sg+Par
!!€  marjaks: marj+N+Sg+Tra
!!€  marjata: marj+N+Sg+Abe
!!€  marjanke: marj+N+Sg+Com
!!€  marjas: marj+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  marjaspäi: marj+N+Sg+Ela
!!€  marjaha: marj+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  marjal: marj+N+Sg+Ade
!!€  marjalpäi: marj+N+Sg+Abl
!!€  marjale: marj+N+Sg+All
!!€  marjan: marj+N+Sg+EssInst
!!€  marjadme: marj+N+Sg+Prl
!!€  marjanno: marj+N+Sg+Apr1
!!€  marjannoks: marj+N+Sg+Apr2
!!€  marjannopäi: marj+N+Sg+Egr
!!€  marjahosai: marj+N+Sg+Ter1
!!€  marjalesai: marj+N+Sg+Ter2
!!€  marjassai: marj+N+Sg+Ter3
!!€  marjahopäi: marj+N+Sg+Add1
!!€  marjalepäi: marj+N+Sg+Add2

!!€  marjad: marj+N+Pl+Nom
!!€  [marjoid'en, marjoiden] # checking needed: marj+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  marjad: marj+N+Pl+Acc
!!€  marjoid: marj+N+Pl+Par
!!€  marjoikš: marj+N+Pl+Tra
!!€  marjoita: marj+N+Pl+Abe
!!€  marjoidenke: marj+N+Pl+Com
!!€  marjoiš: marj+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  marjoišpäi: marj+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  marjoihe: marj+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  marjoil: marj+N+Pl+Ade
!!€  marjoilpäi: marj+N+Pl+Abl
!!€  marjoile: marj+N+Pl+All
!!€  marjoin: marj+N+Pl+EssInst
!!€  marjoidme: marj+N+Pl+Prl
!!€  marjoidenno: marj+N+Pl+Apr1
!!€  marjoidennoks: marj+N+Pl+Apr2
!!€  marjoidennopäi: marj+N+Pl+Egr
!!€  marjoihesai: marj+N+Pl+Ter1
!!€  marjoilesai: marj+N+Pl+Ter2
!!€  marjoihepäi: marj+N+Pl+Add1
!!€  marjoilepäi: marj+N+Pl+Add2
!:QAO1 NMN_ ;
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ha K ;
:%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_PAVEL
!: N_0/RmVow ;
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%^RmVow%>aha K ;
+Sg+Par:%^RmVow%>ad K ;
:%^RmVow%>a SG-OBLIQUE_NO_DERIV/ILL/PAR ;
! Plural
!:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
!:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
!:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_FILIP
!: N_ ;
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:p%>aha K ;
+Sg+Par:p%>ad K ;
:pa SG-OBLIQUE_NO_DERIV/ILL/PAR ;
! Plural
!:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
!:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
!:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_IGA ! igä:ig
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:ä SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hä K ;
:%>ä SG-OBLIQUE ;
:%>ä R ; ! xxx check

! Plural
:%>ä PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>ä PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_LEIB ! leib:leib
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  leib: leib+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  leibän: leib+N+Sg+Gen
!!€  leibid: leib+N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hä K ;
:%>ä SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>ä PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>ä PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_PERT1 ! pertʼ:pert
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!pertʼ
!pertin
!pertid
:ʼ SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hä K ;
:%>ä SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>ä PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>ä PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_LIND ! lind:lind
 N_0/un/ud/hu/uid ;
LEXICON N_0/un/ud/hu/uid ! lind:lind
! N_0/un/ud/hu/uid
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hu K ;
:%>u SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>u PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>u PL-ACC-SUF ;
:u PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_JAUH ! jauh:jauh
 N_0/on/od/oho/oid ;
LEXICON N_0/on/od/oho/oid ! jauh:jauh
! _0/on/Q/ho/oid?
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  heim: +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  heimon: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  heimod: +N+Sg+Par
!!€  heimoho: +N+Sg+Ill
!!€  heimoid: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ho K ;
:%>o SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>o PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>o PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_0/on/od/ho/oid ! rad:rad
! N_0/on/od/ho/oid
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ho K ;
:%>o SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>o PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>o PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SHAPUK ! šapuk
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:U1 NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_UNI ! uni:un
! _i/en/t/Q/id  Q=unknown
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_POIG ! poig:poig
! _a/an/Q/ha/id
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  poig: poig+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  poigan: poig+N+Sg+Gen
!!€  poigid: poig+N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:a SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:a PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_0/an/ad/aha/id ! uskonda:uskond
! _0/an/ad/aha/id
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  uskond: uskond+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  uskondan: uskond+N+Sg+Gen
!!€  uskondaha: uskond+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  uskondid: uskond+N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:a SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:a PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VENEH ! veneh:veneh
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_HANG ! hang:hang
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_LANDEH ! landeh:land
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!:EH1 NMN_ ;
:eh SG-NOM-SUF ;
:eh SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SEIBAZ ! seibaz:seib
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:az SG-NOM-SUF ;
:as SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ha SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ha PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ha PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KIRVEZ ! kirvez:kirv
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:ez SG-NOM-SUF ;
:es SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VANHAKOZ ! vanhakoz:vanhak
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:oz SG-NOM-SUF ;
:os SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ho SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ho PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ho PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_NAGRIZH ! nagriž:nagr
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:iž SG-NOM-SUF ;
:iš SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;
