src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
ahven+N:ahven N_VENEH ;
ambund+N:ambund N_MARJ ;
aug+N:aug N_JAUH ;
azeg+v1+N:azeg N_HANG ;
bab+N:bab N_MARJ ;
buk+N:buk N_MARJ ;
bumbak+N:bumbak N_JAUH ;
ekran+N:ekran N_POIG ;
ezmärg+v1+N:ezmärg N_HANG ;
fater+N:fater N_MARJ ;
garič+N:garič N_LIND ;
habobatk+N:hab#obatk N_MARJ ;
hahkač+N:hahkač N_LIND ;
hala+N:hal N_SANA ;
hang+v1+N:hang N_HANG ;
harav+N:harav N_JAUH ;
heng+v1+N:heng N_HANG ;
hogineh+N:hogineh N_VENEH ;
hoštand+N:hoštand N_MARJ ;
hämähouk+N:hämä#houk N_LIND ;
händ+N:händ N_POIG ;
höuneh+N:höun N_LANDEH ;
hüvä+N:hüv N_IGA ;
igä+N:ig N_IGA ;
jauganpohj+N:jaugan#pohj N_POIG ;
jurutk+N:jurutk N_JAUH ;
jälʼg+v1+N:jälʼg N_HANG ;
jüguzʼmašin+N:jüguzʼ#mašin N_MARJ ;
kahesa+N:kahes N_MUNA ;
kajag+v1+N:kajag N_HANG ;
kakač+N:kakač N_LIND ;
kala+N:kal N_SANA ;
kangaz+N:kang N_SEIBAZ ;
karbaz+N:karb N_SEIBAZ ;
kart+N:kart N_MARJ ;
katačhein+N:katač#hein N_LEIB ;
kažinpoig+N:kažin#poig N_POIG ;
kell+N:kell N_JAUH ;
kera+N:ker N_SANA ;
keskpäiv+N:kesk#päiv N_LEIB ;
kindaz+N:kind N_SEIBAZ ;
kirvez+N:kirv N_KIRVEZ ;
kišt+N:kišt N_JAUH ;
koda+N:kod N_MUNA ;
kodalind+N:koda#lind N_LIND ;
koiv+N:koiv N_LIND ;
koivžom+N:koivžom N_POIG ;
korv+N:korv N_POIG ;
koumanzʼpäiv+N:koumanzʼ#päiv N_LEIB ;
koza+N:koz N_MUNA ;
kočak+N:kočak N_JAUH ;
kuhm+N:kuhm N_LIND ;
kukaz+N:kuk N_SEIBAZ ;
kurdeh+N:kurd N_LANDEH ;
kurg+v1+N:kurg N_HANG ;
käbäl+N:käbäl N_POIG ;
kägä+N:käg N_IGA ;
käred+N:käred N_MARJ ;
kärmeh+N:kärmeh N_VENEH ;
külä+N:kül N_IGA ;
külʼg+v1+N:külʼg N_HANG ;
laineh+N:lain N_LANDEH ;
lainiž+N:lain N_NAGRIZH ;
landeh+N:land N_LANDEH ;
lava+N:lav N_SANA ;
lač+N:lač N_LIND ;
lehm+N:lehm N_LEIB ;
lehtik+N:lehtik N_JAUH ;
leib+N:leib N_LEIB ;
lep+N:lep N_MARJ ;
likutimveneh+v1+N:likutim#veneh N_VENEH ;
lipaz+N:lip N_SEIBAZ ;
lomineh+N:lomineh N_VENEH ;
lop+N:lop N_LIND ;
ludeghein+N:ludeg#hein N_LEIB ;
läg+N:läg N_LEIB ;
maid+N:maid N_JAUH ;
maimkala+N:maim#kal N_SANA ;
mecnik+N:mecnik N_MARJ ;
mecsiga+N:mec#sig N_SANA ;
minus+N:minus N_POIG ;
modkuva+N:mod#kuv N_MUNA ;
mouchein+N:mouc#hein N_LEIB ;
muna+N:mun N_MUNA ;
murašk+N:murašk N_JAUH ;
muštpacaz+N:mušt#pac N_SEIBAZ ;
märg+N:märg N_POIG ;
mätaz+N:mät N_SEIBAZ ;
nagriž+N:nagr N_NAGRIZH ;
nellänzʼpäiv+N:nellänzʼ#päiv N_LEIB ;
nena+N:nen N_SANA ;
nit+N:nit N_LIND ;
nodj+N:nodj N_JAUH ;
nor+N:nor N_POIG ;
nova+N:nov N_MUNA ;
oc+N:oc N_POIG ;
oigedsaumnik+N:oiged#saumnik N_MARJ ;
oinaz+N:oin N_SEIBAZ ;
orav+N:orav N_POIG ;
pacaz+N:pac N_SEIBAZ ;
paha+N:pah N_SANA ;
pajumuna+N:paju#mun N_MUNA ;
pala+N:pal N_SANA ;
palʼt+N:palʼt N_JAUH ;
paskač+N:paskač N_LIND ;
pažag+N:pažag N_POIG ;
penzaz+N:penz N_SEIBAZ ;
pera+N:per N_SANA ;
pereh+N:pereh N_VENEH ;
pertʼ+N:pert N_PERT1 ;
peza+N:pez N_SANA ;
piring+N:piring N_JAUH ;
pisk+N:pisk N_LIND ;
pitʼk+N:pitʼk N_LEIB ;
porzaz+N:porz N_SEIBAZ ;
počt+N:počt N_POIG ;
puišt+N:puišt N_JAUH ;
pureh+N:pureh N_VENEH ;
päiv+N:päiv N_LEIB ;
pälidn+N:pä#lidn N_MARJ ;
pühä+N:püh N_IGA ;
pühäpäiv+N:pühä#päiv N_LEIB ;
rad+N:rad N_0/on/od/ho/oid ;
raja+N:raj N_SANA ;
redumajag+v1+N:redu#majag N_HANG ;
rengaz+N:reng N_SEIBAZ ;
ristit+N:ristit N_LIND ;
rova+N:rov N_MUNA ;
rubisamba+N:rubi#samb N_SANA ;
sabr+N:sabr N_MARJ ;
saliž+N:sal N_NAGRIZH ;
samba+N:samb N_SANA ;
seibaz+N:seib N_SEIBAZ ;
seikh+v1+N:seikh N_HANG ;
selʼg+N:selʼg N_LEIB ;
siga+N:sig N_SANA ;
sija+N:sij N_MUNA ;
sizar+N:sizar N_VENEH ;
soda+N:sod N_MUNA ;
sohein+N:so#hein N_LEIB ;
suga+N:sug N_MUNA ;
sumk+N:sumk N_POIG ;
sänijaug+N:säni#jaug N_MARJ ;
särg+v1+N:särg N_HANG ;
särm+N:särm N_LEIB ;
sömsija+N:söm#sij N_MUNA ;
tahtaz+N:taht N_SEIBAZ ;
tanaz+N:tan N_SEIBAZ ;
tomič+N:tomič N_LIND ;
tora+N:tor N_MUNA ;
toreh+N:tor N_LANDEH ;
tožnarg+v1+N:tožnarg N_HANG ;
tuha+N:tuh N_MUNA ;
tülʼc+N:tülʼc N_LEIB ;
udar+N:udar N_VENEH ;
uk+N:uk N_JAUH ;
uni+N:un N_UNI ;
unikuva+N:uni#kuv N_MUNA ;
učubras+N:učubras N_MARJ ;
valeg+v1+N:valeg N_HANG ;
vandeh+N:vand N_LANDEH ;
vanhakoz+N:vanhak N_VANHAKOZ ;
vanhemb+N:vanhemb N_POIG ;
varuč+N:varuč N_LIND ;
vaza+N:vaz N_SANA ;
veneh+N:veneh N_VENEH ;
veraz+N:ver N_SEIBAZ ;
veri+N:ver N_UNI ;
vikateh+N:vikateh N_VENEH ;
vozʼsada+N:vozʼ#sad N_SANA ;
änik+N:änik N_JAUH ;
čak+N:čak N_MARJ ;
čas+N:čas N_LIND ;
čoga+N:čog N_MUNA ;
čura+N:čur N_MUNA ;
šapuk+N:šapU1k N_SHAPUK ;
